Hawaii statutes.
[§329-13] Schedule I tests. A
substance shall be placed in schedule I if it has the highest degree of danger
or probable danger according to the determination made pursuant to section
329-11. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next